Utah statutes.
10-6-145.   City treasurer -- Special assessments -- Application of proceeds.

All money received by the treasurer on any special assessment shall be applied to the payment of the improvement for which the assessment was made. The money shall be used for the payment of interest and principal on bonds or other indebtedness issued in settlement thereof, and shall be used for no other purpose whatever, except as otherwise provided in Section 10-6-131.



Enacted by Chapter 26, 1979 General Session

